Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.515

Community and technical colleges—State-funded enrollment levels—Summer school—Enrollment level variances.

(1) The boards of trustees of the community and technical college districts may operate summer schools on either a self-supporting or a state-funded basis.

If summer school is operated on a self-supporting basis, the fees charged shall be retained by the colleges, and shall be sufficient to cover the direct costs, which are instructional salaries and related benefits, supplies, publications, and records.

Community and technical colleges that have self-supporting summer schools shall continue to receive general fund state support for vocational programs that require that students enroll in a four quarter sequence of courses that includes summer quarter due to clinical or laboratory requirements and for ungraded courses limited to adult basic education, vocational apprenticeship, aging and retirement, small business management, industrial first aid, and parent education.

(2) The board of trustees of a community or technical college district may permit the district's state-funded, full-time equivalent enrollment level, as provided in the omnibus state appropriations act, to vary. If the variance is above the state-funded level, the district may charge those students above the state-funded level a fee equivalent to the amount of tuition and fees that are charged students enrolled in state-funded courses. These fees shall be retained by the colleges.

(3) The state board for community and technical colleges shall ensure compliance with this section.

[ 2015 c 55 s 216. Prior: 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 13; 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 8; 1991 c 353 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Findings—Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 28B.10.776.

Effective date—1991 c 353: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 15, 1991." [ 1991 c 353 s 3.]